Missouri, session 2026, SB1640.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 338, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 338.312, to read as
follows:
338.312. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context requires otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Declared state disaster or emergency", a disaster
or emergency event for which a governor's state of emergency
proclamation has been issued or that the President of the
United States has declared to be a major disaster or
emergency;
(2) "Disaster period", the period of time that begins
ten days before a governor's proclamation of a state of
emergency or the declaration by the President of the United
States of a major disaster or emergency, whichever occurs
first, and extending for a period of sixty calendar days
following the end of the period specified in the
proclamation or declaration or sixty calendar days from the
proclamation or declaration if no end is provided. The
governor may extend the disaster period as warranted;
(3) "Nonprofit pharmacy", any pharmacy licensed in
this state that operates as a charitable organization under

SB 1640 2
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
amended.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the board of pharmacy shall have the authority to
waive compliance with any Missouri rules and regulations for
pharmacies licensed in this state when such nonprofit
pharmacy is dispensing, shipping, or delivering prescription
drugs into another state or United States territory that is
experiencing a declared state disaster or emergency,
provided that:
(1) The nonprofit pharmacy is a licensed pharmacy in
good standing under this chapter and is authorized to ship
prescription drugs into the state or territory in question;
(2) The nonprofit pharmacy is responding to an active
declared state disaster or emergency;
(3) The nonprofit pharmacy complies with all emergency
rules and regulations for pharmacies and nonprofit
pharmacies established by the state or territory for the
duration of the disaster period;
(4) The nonprofit pharmacy complies with all
applicable federal laws and regulations; and
(5) The waiver applies only to prescription drugs
dispensed, shipped, or delivered to residents or health care
facilities located within the geographic area specified in
the declared state disaster or emergency.
3. The board of pharmacy may promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section
536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with
and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and,
if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter

SB 1640 3
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with
the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to
delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule
are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓